District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1507

Fraud by use of slugs to operate coin-controlled mechanism

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(v)-(x), 29 DCR 3976

History

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1407 to 22-1409.

Prior Codifications